it: Certificazione/standard della batteria Cassa: Specifica ATA 300 (custodia per trasporto aereo); Linee guida imballaggio batterie al litio IATA/ICAO; IEC 62133; Non certificato/Non specificato; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (classe di infiammabilità); Conforme a UN 38.3; Altro
hr-HR: Certifikat/standard za kutiju za baterije: ATA spec. 300 (kofer za zračni prijevoz); Smjernice IATA-e/ICAO-a za pakiranje litijevih baterija; IEC 62133; Nije certificirano / nije navedeno; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (ocjena zapaljivosti); Sukladno s UN 38.3; Ostalo
sk-SK: Certifikácia/norma puzdra batérie: ATA Spec 300 (prepravné puzdro do lietadla); Smernice IATA/ICAO o balení lítiových batérií; IEC 62133; Bez certifikácie/neuvedené; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (klasifikácia horľavosti); V súlade s UN 38.3; Iné
da: Certificering/standarder for batterikasse: ATA Spec 300 (transportkasse til fly); IATA-/ICAO-vejledning til emballering af litiumbatterier; IEC 62133; Ikke certificeret / ikke angivet; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (brandklassificeret); Overholder UN 38.3; Andet
sv: Certifiering/standard för batterilåda: ATA spec 300 (flygtransportväska); Riktlinjer för förpackning av litiumbatterier enligt IATA/ICAO; IEC 62133; Inte certifierad / ej angivet; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (brandklassad); Uppfyller UN 38.3; Övrigt
vi: Chứng nhận/tiêu chuẩn hộp đựng pin: ATA Spec 300 (hộp vận chuyển hàng không); Hướng dẫn đóng gói pin lithium của IATA/ICAO; IEC 62133; Không được chứng nhận/Không nêu rõ; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (được xếp hạng tính dễ cháy); Tuân thủ UN 38.3; Khác
pt-BR: Certificação/padrão da caixa para bateria: Especificação ATA 300 (estojo de transporte aéreo); Orientação de embalagem de bateria de lítio da IATA/ICAO; IEC 62133; Sem certificação/Não especificado; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (classificação de inflamabilidade); Em conformidade com UN 38.3; Outro
sl-SI: Certificiranje/standard ohišja za baterijo: ATA Spec 300 (kovček za zračni prevoz); Smernice IATA/ICAO za pakiranje litijevih baterij; IEC 62133; Ni certificirano/Ni navedeno; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (ocena vnetljivosti); Skladno z UN 38.3; Drugo
th: การรับรอง/มาตรฐานเคสแบตเตอรี่: ATA Spec 300 (เคสขนส่งทางอากาศ); ข้อแนะนำบรรจุภัณฑ์แบตเตอรี่ลิเธียม IATA/ICAO; IEC 62133; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง/ไม่ระบุ; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (ระดับการติดไฟ); เป็นไปตามมาตรฐาน UN 38.3; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 电池盒认证/标准: ATA Spec 300（航空运输箱）; IATA/ICAO 锂电池包装指南; IEC 62133; 未认证/未说明; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94（可燃性等级）; 符合 UN 38.3 要求; 其他
pl: Certyfikaty/normy walizki na akumulatory: ATA Spec 300 (walizka do transportu lotniczego); Wytyczne IATA/ICAO dotyczące pakowania baterii litowych; IEC 62133; Brak certyfikatu/Brak informacji; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (klasa palności); Zgodne z UN 38.3; Inne
ru: Сертификация/стандарт корпуса батареи: ATA Spec 300 (транспортировочный кофр); Руководство IATA/ICAO по упаковке литиевых батарей; IEC 62133; Без сертификации / не указано; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (оценка горючести); Соответствие UN 38.3; Другое
en: Battery case certification/standard: ATA Spec 300 (air transport case); IATA/ICAO lithium battery packaging guidance; IEC 62133; Not certified/Not stated; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (flammability rated); UN 38.3 compliant; Other
el: Πιστοποίηση/πρότυπο θήκης μπαταρίας: ATA Spec 300 (θήκη αερομεταφοράς); Οδηγίες συσκευασίας μπαταριών λιθίου IATA/ICAO; IEC 62133; Μη πιστοποιημένο/Δεν αναφέρεται; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (διαβάθμιση ευφλεκτότητας); Συμβατό με UN 38.3; Άλλο
bg-BG: Сертификация/стандарт на корпуса на батерията: ATA Spec 300 (куфар за въздушен транспорт); Насоки за опаковане на литиеви батерии на IATA/ICAO; IEC 62133; Без сертификат/не е посочен; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (клас на запалимост); Съвместим с UN 38.3; Друго
pt-PT: Certificação/norma da caixa de bateria: ATA Spec 300 (caixa de transporte aéreo); Orientações de embalagens para baterias de lítio da IATA/ICAO; IEC 62133; Não certificado/não indicado; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (classificação de inflamabilidade); Em conformidade com a norma UN 38.3; Outro
fi: Akun kotelon sertifikaatti/standardi: ATA Spec 300 (lentokuljetuskotelo); IATA:n/ICAO:n ohjeet litiumakkujen pakkaamiselle; IEC 62133; Ei sertifioitu / ei ilmoitettu; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (paloturvallisuusluokiteltu); UN 38.3 -yhteensopiva; Muu
tr: Batarya taşıma çantası sertifikasyonu/standardı: ATA Spec 300 (hava taşımacılığı çantası); IATA/ICAO lityum pil paketleme kılavuzu; IEC 62133; Sertifikasız/Belirtilmemiş; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (yanmazlık derecesi); UN 38.3 uyumlu; Diğer
zh-TW: 電池盒認證/標準: ATA 規範 300 (空運收納箱); IATA/ICAO 鋰電池包裝指引; IEC 62133; 未認證/未標示; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (阻燃等級); 符合 UN 38.3 規範; 其他
de: Zertifizierung/Standard der Batteriebox: ATA Spec 300 (Flugtransportkoffer); IATA/ICAO-Richtlinien für die Verpackung von Lithium-Batterien; IEC 62133; Nicht zertifiziert/Nicht angegeben; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (Brandklasse); Konform mit UN 38.3; Sonstige
ro-RO: Certificare/standard pentru carcasa bateriei: ATA Spec 300 (geantă de transport aerian); Îndrumări IATA/ICAO privind ambalarea bateriilor cu litiu; IEC 62133; Necertificat/Nespecificat; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (grad de inflamabilitate); Conformitate cu UN 38.3; Altele
nb: Batteri eske-sertifisering/standard: ATA Spec 300 (flytransportkasse); IATA/ICAO-retningslinjer for pakking av litiumbatterier; IEC 62133; Ikke sertifisert/ikke oppgitt; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (brannklassifisert); Oppfyller UN 38.3; Annet
cs: Certifikace/standard pouzdra na baterie: ATA Spec 300 (přepravní kufr pro leteckou dopravu); Pokyny IATA/ICAO pro balení lithiových baterií; IEC 62133; Není certifikováno / neuvedeno; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (hodnocení hořlavosti); V souladu s UN 38.3; Jiné
lt-LT: Akumuliatoriaus dėklo sertifikavimas / standartas: ATA Spec 300 (oro transporto dėklas); IATA / ICAO ličio baterijų pakavimo gairės; IEC 62133; Nesertifikuota / nenurodyta; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (įvertintas degumas); Atitinka UN 38.3; Kita
es: Certificación/estándar de caja de batería: ATA Spec 300 (estuche de transporte aéreo); Guía de embalaje de baterías de litio de la IATA/OACI; IEC 62133; No certificado/no indicado; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (clasificación de inflamabilidad); Cumple con UN 38.3; Otro
ko: 배터리 케이스 인증/규격: ATA Spec 300(항공 운송 케이스); IATA/ICAO 리튬 배터리 포장 지침; IEC 62133; 미인증/기재 안 됨; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94(난연성 등급); UN 38.3 준수; 기타
fr: Normes et certifications du boîtier de batterie: Spécification ATA 300 (étui de transport aérien); Directives IATA/OACI pour l'emballage des batteries au lithium; IEC 62133; Non certifié/non indiqué; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (classe d'inflammabilité); Conforme à UN 38.3; Autre
ja: バッテリーケースの認証／規格: ATA 規格 300 (航空輸送用ケース); IATA/ICAO リチウム電池梱包ガイドライン; IEC 62133; 認証なし/記載なし; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (難燃性規格); UN 38.3 準拠; その他
nl: Batterijkoffer certificering/standaard: ATA Spec 300 (luchttransportkoffer); IATA/ICAO-richtlijnen voor lithiumbatterijverpakkingen; IEC 62133; Niet gecertificeerd/Niet vermeld; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (brandbaarheidsclassificatie); Voldoet aan UN 38.3; Overig
hu: Akkumulátordoboz-tanúsítvány/-szabvány: ATA Spec 300 (légi szállítási tok); IATA/ICAO lítium akkumulátorok csomagolási útmutatója; IEC 62133; Nem tanúsított / Nincs megadva; SAE J2464; UL 2054; UL 2580; UL 94 (tűzállósági besorolás); UN 38.3 szabványnak megfelelő; Egyéb